District of Columbia statutes.
9-318

Grade crossing at Lamond closed.

The highway grade crossing formerly over the tracks and right-of-way of the Metropolitan branch of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company at Lamond shall be forever closed against further traffic of any kind.

Mar. 2, 1925, 43 Stat. 1097, ch. 395, § 3
1973 Ed., § 7-518.
1981 Ed., § 7-518.